District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0491.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Artificial Intelligence Literacy in Education Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this act, the term:
(1) “AI” means artificial intelligence, which is the simulation of human
intelligence through the use of algorithms, data, and computational powers with the goal of
enabling machines or software to perform tasks that typically require human intelligence, such as
learning, reasoning, problem-solving, perception, and language understanding.
(2) “AI Literacy” means the knowledge and skills needed to interact with artificial
and generative intelligence systems effectively, including understanding how AI functions and
the use of AI responsibly to monitor its performance and to think about its role in human lives.
This includes learning about how AI is made and used, recognizing both positive aspects and
potential issues, considering the moral and ethical questions AI raises, and learning the skills

needed to assess the accuracy, credibility, and provenance of digital content, including content
that may be AI generated.
(3) “Generative AI” means a type of technology that generates new content such
as text, images, audio, code, and video resembling what humans can produce by learning patterns
and structures from existing data. It learns from inputs and searchable data.
(4) “LEA” means local education agency, which is the District of Columbia
Public Schools system or any individual public character school or group of public charter
schools operating under a single charter.
(5) “OSSE” means Office of the State Superintendent of Education.
Sec. 3. LEA requirements for an artificial and generative intelligence literacy policy.
(a) No later than 15 days before the start of the 2026-27 School Year, each LEA serving
students enrolled in grades 9-12 shall adopt and implement a model AI literacy policy addressing
appropriate use and instruction of artificial and generative intelligence by students and staff for
educational purposes.
(a) Each LEA’s AI literacy policy shall:
(1) Introduce artificial and generative intelligence concepts;
(2) Define appropriate and responsible access and use of artificial and generative
intelligence in an educational setting; and
(3) Critically evaluate various artificial and generative intelligence tools within
the curriculum taught by the educator with a focus on transparency, equity, accountability,
privacy, security, safety, and the ability to assess the intent and credibility behind AI generated
content.
(b) OSSE shall:

(1) Issue guidance on how to implement the required instruction and provide a
professional development program in artificial and generative intelligence education for
educators, including professional and operational efficiency and personal and social wellbeing
for students and staff; and
(2) Require at least one professional development course per school year for
educators to gain knowledge and skills to integrate artificial and generative AI into their
teaching, including training media literacy skills relevant to AI, such as evaluating sources,
identifying AI generated content, and teaching students how to navigate misinformation.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.